New York, session 2025-2026, A9461.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 2, 3, 4, 5, 7 and 9 of section 392-k of the 2 general business law, as added by a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending 3 the general business law relating to establishing standards for glass 4 repair and calibration of advanced driver assistance systems, as 5 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 4879-B and A. 6943-B, are 6 amended and a new subdivision 10 is added to read as follows: 7 2. Requirements. If a motor vehicle is equipped with an advanced driv- 8 er assistance system, a motor vehicle glass repair [shop] facility that 9 conducts safety glass or motor vehicle glass repair, replacement, or 10 recalibration shall inform the consumer: 11 (a) if a recalibration of the advanced driver assistance system is 12 required; and 13 (b) if a recalibration of the advanced driver assistance system is 14 performed that such system shall meet the motor vehicle's manufacturer 15 specifications. 16 3. Notification. (a) A motor vehicle glass repair facility shall 17 provide to [consumers] the consumer an itemized description of the work 18 to be done on the motor vehicle. 19 (b) A motor vehicle glass repair facility shall not represent to a 20 consumer that the cost of a repair, replacement or calibration or recal- 21 ibration shall be paid for entirely by the [consumer's] an insurer and 22 at no cost to the consumer unless the cost of the repair, replacement, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09393-06-6 A. 9461 2 1 calibration or recalibration is fully covered as provided by [the 2 consumer's] an applicable insurance policy. 3 (c) [A] For replacements, repairs, calibrations and recalibrations 4 being paid for through insurance coverage, a motor vehicle glass repair 5 facility shall not contract with a person for a repair or replacement of 6 damaged safety glass or motor vehicle glass until the motor vehicle 7 glass repair [shop] facility has received a claim or referral number, if 8 applicable, for insurance covered damage. 9 (d) Prior to finalizing a contract for repair with a consumer for a 10 repair or replacement of damaged motor vehicle glass, a motor vehicle 11 glass repair facility shall notify such consumer: 12 (i) whether such motor vehicle has an advanced driver assistance 13 system; 14 (ii) whether the calibration or recalibration of the motor vehicle's 15 advanced driver assistance system is required to: 16 (1) make the advanced driver assistance system operable; and 17 (2) ensure that the repair or replacement of damaged motor vehicle 18 glass is performed in a manner that meets the vehicle manufacturer's 19 specifications; 20 (iii) whether the motor vehicle glass repair facility can calibrate or 21 recalibrate the advanced driver assistance system in a manner that meets 22 the motor vehicle's manufacturers specifications; and 23 (iv) if the motor vehicle glass repair facility is not capable of 24 performing a calibration or recalibration as referenced in subdivision 25 three of this section, that the motor vehicle should be taken to the 26 vehicle's manufacturer certified dealership or a qualified specialist 27 capable of performing the calibration or recalibration that meets the 28 vehicle's manufacturer specifications. 29 (e) An insurer shall not mandate or require motor vehicle glass repair 30 facilities to install replacement motor vehicle glass that is not capa- 31 ble of being calibrated or recalibrated to the vehicle's manufacturer 32 specifications. 33 4. Unsuccessful recalibration. If a recalibration was not performed or 34 not completed successfully, the motor vehicle glass repair facility 35 shall inform the consumer and [the consumer's] insurer electronically or 36 in writing that the recalibration was not successful or was not 37 performed and that the motor vehicle should be taken to a franchised 38 motor vehicle dealer or a motor vehicle glass repair facility capable of 39 performing the calibration or recalibration of an advanced driver 40 assistance system that meets the motor vehicle manufacturer's specifica- 41 tions. Motor vehicle glass repair facilities shall not charge the 42 consumer or insurer for the costs associated with such unsuccessful 43 recalibrations. 44 5. Recalibration requirements. A motor vehicle glass repair facility 45 that conducts a calibration, recalibration or replacement on a motor 46 vehicle equipped with an advanced driver assistance system shall: 47 (a) [shall] recalibrate the advanced driver assistance system to meet 48 such motor vehicle's manufacturer specifications; and 49 (b) is not limited to safety glass or motor vehicle glass, tools, 50 equipment, or repair procedures dictated or recommended by the motor 51 vehicle manufacturer to meet such motor vehicle's manufacturer specifi- 52 cations. 53 7. Assignment of benefits. (a) No motor vehicle glass repair facility 54 shall include an assignment of benefits provision for [a consumer's] an 55 insurance policy in any agreement with [such] a consumer or require a A. 9461 3 1 consumer to sign an assignment of benefits agreement as a condition of 2 repairing or replacing damaged motor vehicle glass. 3 (b) Any contract entered in violation of this subdivision shall be 4 void and unenforceable. 5 (c) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prohibit a 6 consumer from authorizing or directing payment to, or paying, a motor 7 vehicle glass repair facility for repair or replacement of damaged motor 8 vehicle glass covered under an insurance policy. 9 9. [Penalties. A motor vehicle glass repair facility that violates the 10 provisions of this section shall be liable for a penalty of two thousand 11 five hundred dollars per occurrence] Violations. Violations of the 12 provisions of this section shall result in a written warning for the 13 first violation, a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars 14 for the second violation, and a civil penalty of not more than two thou- 15 sand dollars for each succeeding violation. 16 10. Application. Nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt 17 any motor vehicle glass repair shop that performs safety glass or motor 18 vehicle glass repair or replacement, or recalibration on a motor vehicle 19 equipped with an advanced driver assistance system, from complying with 20 all applicable provisions of article twelve-A of the vehicle and traffic 21 law and any rules or regulations promulgated thereunder. 22 § 2. Section 2 of a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the general 23 business law relating to establishing standards for glass repair and 24 calibration of advanced driver assistance systems, as proposed in legis- 25 lative bills numbers S. 4879-B and A. 6943-B, is amended to read as 26 follows: 27 § 2. This act shall take effect [immediately] on the one hundred 28 eightieth day after it shall have become a law. 29 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 30 section one of this act shall take effect on the same date and in the 31 same manner as a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the general busi- 32 ness law relating to establishing standards for glass repair and cali- 33 bration of advanced driver assistance systems, as proposed in legisla- 34 tive bills numbers S. 4879-B and A. 6943-B, takes effect.